Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB191.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. In addition to the customer charges for the provision
of sewer, water and electric service, a customer of a board of public
utilities shall not be assessed an amount of fees, taxes, payment in lieu of
taxes or other charges in an amount that exceeds 15% of the combined
utility service charges for the provision of such sewer, water and electric
service.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 13-1223a is hereby amended to read as follows: 13-
1223a. Except as provided in section 1, and amendments thereto, the board
of public utilities shall, at the direction of the governing body of the city,
may bill, collect and enforce collection of sewer service charges through
the administrative departments of the board in accordance with rules and
regulations and on terms and conditions established by the governing body
of the city.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 13-1227 is hereby amended to read as follows: 13-
1227. (a) Except as provided in section 1, and amendments thereto, the
board of public utilities shall fix reasonable rates for water furnished to
consumers which that will:
(1) Will Secure an income sufficient to pay all salaries and wages of
all officers and employees in such departments;
(2) will cover the cost of all materials and supplies used in the
operation of the plant;
(3) will cover the cost of all repairs;
(4) will cover all miscellaneous expenses;
(5) will pay the principal of and the interest on all revenue bond
indebtedness of the city incurred for the purpose of purchasing, improving
or extending the waterworks, and will provide a sinking fund sufficient to
pay the principal of and the interest on such indebtedness at maturity; and
(6) will cover the cost of all repairs and renewals of the plant and all
material used, together with a reasonable allowance for emergency and
unforeseen expenses.

SB 191 2
(b) Upon direction of the city, the board shall install, repair, replace
and remove fire hydrants at a reasonable cost determined by the city and
shall provide an adequate water supply through such hydrants at a
reasonable cost determined by the city. The city may fix special rates for
water furnished to the city for public purposes, or to organized institutions
of charity.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 13-1228 is hereby amended to read as follows: 13-
1228. (a) Except as provided in section 1, and amendments thereto, the
board of public utilities shall fix reasonable rates for electricity furnished
to consumers which that will:
(1) Will Secure an income sufficient to pay all salaries and wages of
all officers and employees in such department;
(2) will cover the cost of all materials and supplies used in the
operation of the plant;
(3) will cover the cost of all repairs;
(4) will cover all miscellaneous expenses;
(5) will pay the principal of and the interest on all revenue bond
indebtedness of the city incurred for the purpose of purchasing, improving
or extending the electric-light plant and will provide a sinking fund
sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such indebtedness at
maturity; and
(6) will cover the cost of all repairs and renewals of the plant and all
material used, together with a reasonable allowance for emergency and
unforeseen expenses.
(b) Upon direction of the city, the board shall install, repair, maintain
and replace street lighting equipment and traffic signal equipment at a
reasonable cost determined by the city, and shall provide an adequate
supply of electricity to such street lights and traffic signals at a reasonable
cost determined by the city. The city may fix special rates for electricity
furnished to the city for public purposes.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 13-1223a, 13-1227 and 13-1228 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 6. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.